Utah statutes.
39-1-38.   Regulations and forms.
The commander in chief may establish and prescribe regulations and forms not
inconsistent with law, or regulations governing the National Guard promulgated
by the President of the United States, as he considers proper for the use,
government, and instruction of the National Guard, and to carry into full
effect the provisions of related law. The regulations and forms shall be
revised as necessary, and shall be promulgated in orders and compiled as
advisable for the information of the National Guard.
